North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 4. Delegates.

§ 55A-6-40.
Delegates.

A corporation may provide in its articles of incorporation or bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of delegates, including their selection and removal;

Calling, noticing, holding, and conducting meetings of delegates; and

Carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law. It was adapted from Section 6.40 of the Model Act.